Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1380HV (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 517 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15.263 Vacant school building 1 demolition grant program ââ fund. 2 1. A vacant school building demolition grant fund is created 3 in the state treasury under the control of the authority. The 4 fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to the authority for 5 deposit in the fund and any other moneys that are lawfully 6 available to the authority. 7 2. Moneys in the vacant school building demolition grant 8 fund are appropriated to the authority for purposes of funding 9 a grant program for the demolition of vacant buildings owned 10 by a political subdivision of this state or proposed to be 11 acquired by a political subdivision of this state that became 12 vacant before January 1, 2021, and were at any time previously 13 used as school attendance centers or school administration 14 buildings, but which are no longer used for any political 15 subdivision purpose. 16 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 17 or earnings on moneys deposited in the vacant school building 18 demolition grant fund shall be credited to the vacant school 19 building demolition grant fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, 20 moneys credited to the vacant school building demolition grant 21 fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year. However, 22 if the authority receives no qualifying applications for three 23 consecutive years, the moneys in the vacant school building 24 demolition grant fund shall be transferred for deposit in the 25 rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund. 26 4. The authority may use not more than five percent of 27 the moneys in the fund at the beginning of the fiscal year 28 for purposes of administrative costs, finance, compliance, 29 marketing, and program support. 30 5. a. The authority shall provide grants under this section 31 using a competitive scoring process. The authority shall 32 prioritize grant applications from political subdivisions with 33 the lowest populations as compared to other grant applicants. 34 A grant shall only be approved if the eligible building is 35 -1- LSB 1380HV (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 517 located in a city or township with a population less than 1 two thousand five hundred, and the political subdivision 2 applying is either a county with a population that is among the 3 eighty-eight lowest populated counties in the state or is a 4 political subdivision that is located in whole or in part in 5 such a county. 6 b. In providing grants under this section, the authority 7 shall coordinate with the political subdivision to develop a 8 plan for the use of grant funds that is consistent with the 9 community development, housing, or economic development goals 10 of the political subdivision. 11 c. In providing grants under this section, the authority 12 shall coordinate with the political subdivision to ensure that 13 the condition and use of the property following demolition is 14 consistent with the propertyâs surroundings, including for 15 future new construction, park space, or agricultural use. 16 d. The political subdivision shall not be required to sell 17 the property after demolition as a condition of the grant. 18 However, if the property is sold by the political subdivision 19 following demolition, proceeds from sale of the property, 20 following subtraction of the political subdivisionâs costs 21 related to the demolition, including costs to acquire the 22 property if applicable, shall be paid to the authority for 23 deposit in the vacant school building demolition grant fund. 24 6. The authority shall submit a report to the general 25 assembly and the governorâs office on or before January 31 of 26 each year, describing the results of the program implemented 27 pursuant to this section and making recommendations for 28 additional program changes. 29 Sec. 2. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect 30 July 1, 2025, if legislation is enacted appropriating moneys 31 for deposit in the vacant school building demolition grant fund 32 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. 33